lexc/adj/enhuadja.lexc
! enhuadj1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ @U.ART.ABSENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Mid
+Ik
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §oeoez12§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoezmid§ §OEOE4a§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoebb§ 
§oeoez11§ §OEOE11§
§oeoez1e§ §oeoez11e§ §Jnull§ §JPnull§ 

LEXICON Root
Prefleg;
Prefigekoto;
Prefleg1;

LEXICON Prefleg
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto ; ! optional article prefix
                        Prefigekoto ; ! empty string entry
LEXICON Prefleg1
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj1 ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj1 ; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj1 ; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Adj;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Adj;
+Pref+:széjjel   Adj;
+Pref+:szembe   Adj;
+Pref+:szerte   Adj;
+Pref+:vissza   Adj;
+Pref+:helyre   Adj;
+Pref+:tovább   Adj;
+Pref+:tönkre   Adj;
+Pref+:észre   Adj;
+Pref+:rajta   Adj;
+Pref+:előre   Adj;
+Pref+:félbe   Adj;
+Pref+:félre   Adj;
+Pref+:felül   Adj;
+Pref+:fölül   Adj;
+Pref+:agyon   Adj;
+Pref+:ellen   Adj;
+Pref+:körbe   Adj;
+Pref+:körül   Adj;
+Pref+:közbe   Adj;
+Pref+:közre   Adj;
+Pref+:külön   Adj;
+Pref+:utána   Adj;
+Pref+:végbe   Adj;
+Pref+:végig   Adj;
+Pref+:hátra   Adj;
+Pref+:hozzá   Adj;
+Pref+:egybe   Adj;
+Pref+:ketté   Adj;
+Pref+:össze   Adj;
+Pref+:mellé   Adj;
+Pref+:által   Adj;
+Pref+:alul   Adj;
+Pref+:haza   Adj;
+Pref+:újra   Adj;
+Pref+:abba   Adj;
+Pref+:neki   Adj;
+Pref+:bele   Adj;
+Pref+:újjá   Adj;
+Pref+:benn   Adj;
+Pref+:fenn   Adj;
+Pref+:fönn   Adj;
+Pref+:jóvá   Adj;
+Pref+:szét   Adj;
+Pref+:tele   Adj;
+Pref+:tova   Adj;
+Pref+:meg   Adj;
+Pref+:oda   Adj;
+Pref+:elő   Adj;
+Pref+:túl   Adj;
+Pref+:alá   Adj;
+Pref+:föl   Adj;
+Pref+:ide   Adj;
+Pref+:fel   Adj;
+Pref+:rá   Adj;
+Pref+:ki   Adj;
+Pref+:le   Adj;
+Pref+:el   Adj;
+Pref+:át   Adj;
+Pref+:be   Adj;
            Adj;

LEXICON Adj1
agyondolgozott AddAdj;
agyonhasznált AddAdj;
belebolondult AddAdj;
belebonyolódott AddAdj;
beledolgozott AddAdj;
beleivódott AddAdj;
belepistult AddAdj;
beleszámított AddAdj;
csomagkapcsolt AddAdj;
előrehajlott AddAdj;
előrehaladott AddAdj;
erdőborított AddAdj;
eredményorientált AddAdj;
exportorientált AddAdj;
extrapolált AddAdj;
extrovertált AddAdj;
félbeszakított AddAdj;
fémzárolt AddAdj;
hiteszegett AddAdj;
hozzákapcsolt AddAdj;
hozzászokott AddAdj;
jégkárosult AddAdj;
jóllakott AddAdj;
katasztrófasújtott AddAdj;
keresztrefeszített AddAdj;
kettéhasított AddAdj;
kettévágott AddAdj;
konzulviselt AddAdj;
magaválasztott AddAdj;
napcserzett AddAdj;
pofoncsapott AddAdj;
sportválogatott AddAdj;
sugárfertőzött AddAdj;
szélcserzett AddAdj;
teljesítményorientált AddAdj;
testreszabott AddAdj;
utángyártott AddAdj;
utógondozott AddAdj;
viszontlátott AddAdj;
viszontszeretett AddAdj;
vérehagyott AddAdj;
észrevett AddAdj;
önelégedett AddAdj;
öngyilkosjelölt AddAdj;
örökbefogadott AddAdj;
ügyefogyott AddAdj;
üzembiztos AddAdjat;
üzletorientált AddAdj;

LEXICON AddAdj
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocase;

Lexicon Tocase1
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Poss1;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plur1;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Fam1;

LEXICON Poss1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam1;
LEXICON Plur1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen1;
LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen1;
LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;

Lexicon Tocase
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam11;
LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Fam11
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen11;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Gen11
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;

LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Adj
acélozott AddAdj;
adszorbeált AddAdj;
adósított AddAdj;
aggott AddAdj;
agyalágyult AddAdj;
ahidrált AddAdj;
ajándékozott AddAdj;
akkreditált AddAdj;
alant AddAdj;
aljasult AddAdj;
aládúcolt AddAdj;
amerikaiasodott AddAdj;
antedatált AddAdj;
aranyozott AddAdj;
aszalt AddAdj;
avatott AddAdj;
barikádozott AddAdj;
bigott AddAdj;
bizakodott AddAdj;
biztosított AddAdj;
bolygatott AddAdj;
bontott AddAdj;
bonyolított AddAdj;
borotvált AddAdj;
borzolt AddAdj;
bosszantott AddAdj;
burjánzott AddAdj;
bágyadt AddAdj;
bénult AddAdj;
bökött AddAdj;
cicomázott AddAdj;
csalódott AddAdj;
csapott AddAdj;
csatolt AddAdj;
csinált AddAdj;
csodálkozott AddAdj;
csonkolt AddAdj;
csontozott AddAdj;
csúszott AddAdj;
cukrozott AddAdj;
célorientált AddAdj;
deklasszált AddAdj;
dekompenzált AddAdj;
delokalizált AddAdj;
derivált AddAdj;
differenciált AddAdj;
diszkvalifikált AddAdj;
divatjamúlt AddAdj;
dobódott AddAdj;
domborított AddAdj;
drótozott AddAdj;
díjazott AddAdj;
dúcolt AddAdj;
effeminált AddAdj;
egyensúlyozott AddAdj;
elemzett AddAdj;
enervált AddAdj;
esztergályozott AddAdj;
exponált AddAdj;
fakult AddAdj;
fazonozott AddAdj;
filézett AddAdj;
finomult AddAdj;
fintorított AddAdj;
fogalmazott AddAdj;
foglalkoztatott AddAdj;
fogott AddAdj;
fojtott AddAdj;
foldott AddAdj;
folytatott AddAdj;
fonott AddAdj;
fordított AddAdj;
forgott AddAdj;
forrasztott AddAdj;
foszlott AddAdj;
frakcionált AddAdj;
fuserált AddAdj;
fuvalkodott AddAdj;
fátyolozott AddAdj;
félájult AddAdj;
fóliázott AddAdj;
fölvilágosult AddAdj;
fülezett AddAdj;
főmegbízott AddAdj;
garantált AddAdj;
gazosodott AddAdj;
gettósított AddAdj;
gondozott AddAdj;
grillezett AddAdj;
gyakorlott AddAdj;
gyanúsított AddAdj;
gyomtalanított AddAdj;
gyorsfagyasztott AddAdj;
gyógyult AddAdj;
gázosított AddAdj;
génmanipulált AddAdj;
haditett AddAdj;
hagyatékozott AddAdj;
hajlott AddAdj;
hajszolt AddAdj;
hajított AddAdj;
hallatszott AddAdj;
hallott AddAdj;
halláskárosult AddAdj;
halott AddAdj;
hamarkodott AddAdj;
hangolt AddAdj;
hangzott AddAdj;
hanyagolt AddAdj;
hasznosított AddAdj;
hasított AddAdj;
hatlapolt AddAdj;
határolt AddAdj;
hatástalanított AddAdj;
helyreállított AddAdj;
hitt AddAdj;
hizlalt AddAdj;
holt AddAdj;
horganyzott AddAdj;
hullafáradt AddAdj;
háborgatott AddAdj;
hájasodott AddAdj;
háramlott AddAdj;
háziasított AddAdj;
hívott AddAdj;
húzott AddAdj;
idejétmúlt AddAdj;
igazolt AddAdj;
illatosított AddAdj;
illuminált AddAdj;
impregnált AddAdj;
indikált AddAdj;
indokolt AddAdj;
informált AddAdj;
iskolázott AddAdj;
itatott AddAdj;
izgatott AddAdj;
japánosított AddAdj;
javított AddAdj;
jogosult AddAdj;
jogvédett AddAdj;
jutott AddAdj;
jóvolt AddAdj;
józanodott AddAdj;
kalapált AddAdj;
kapcsolt AddAdj;
karbantartott AddAdj;
karózott AddAdj;
keresztkódolt AddAdj;
keríttetett AddAdj;
klimatizált AddAdj;
kobzott AddAdj;
koholt AddAdj;
komlózott AddAdj;
kompromittálódott AddAdj;
konzervált AddAdj;
kopt AddAdj;
korlátolt AddAdj;
koszlott AddAdj;
kozott AddAdj;
kulturált AddAdj;
kuszált AddAdj;
kárpitozott AddAdj;
kátyúsított AddAdj;
kínzott AddAdj;
körülhatárolt AddAdj;
köztudott AddAdj;
lakkozott AddAdj;
lambériázott AddAdj;
lapított AddAdj;
lenzett AddAdj;
lombozódott AddAdj;
lyukacsozott AddAdj;
lyukazott AddAdj;
láncolt AddAdj;
látszott AddAdj;
légkondicionált AddAdj;
légzett AddAdj;
lótott-futott AddAdj;
macskásodott AddAdj;
magozott AddAdj;
magyarázott AddAdj;
magánalkalmazott AddAdj;
maradott AddAdj;
margózott AddAdj;
mercerizált AddAdj;
mintázott AddAdj;
mocskolt AddAdj;
mosódott AddAdj;
mámorosodott AddAdj;
módosított AddAdj;
nevelkedett AddAdj;
nyitott AddAdj;
nyomott AddAdj;
nyírott AddAdj;
némult AddAdj;
okafogyott AddAdj;
oltott AddAdj;
omolt AddAdj;
ottmaradt AddAdj;
paraméterezett AddAdj;
pauperizálódott AddAdj;
piacosított AddAdj;
poklozott AddAdj;
pontosított AddAdj;
profitorientált AddAdj;
provokált AddAdj;
pusztított AddAdj;
pökött AddAdj;
ragadtatott AddAdj;
rekedett AddAdj;
rokkant AddAdj;
rontott AddAdj;
rozsdásodott AddAdj;
régvolt AddAdj;
sarkított AddAdj;
sodrott AddAdj;
sportolt AddAdj;
szabott AddAdj;
szakavatott AddAdj;
szavatolt AddAdj;
szerelvényezett AddAdj;
szigetelt AddAdj;
szokott AddAdj;
szubvencionált AddAdj;
számozott AddAdj;
származtatott AddAdj;
színehagyott AddAdj;
szőtt AddAdj;
sújtott AddAdj;
talált AddAdj;
tapasztalt AddAdj;
tartott AddAdj;
telt AddAdj;
tiltott AddAdj;
tompított AddAdj;
turbósított AddAdj;
táplált AddAdj;
túltáplált AddAdj;
tűzkárosult AddAdj;
utazott AddAdj;
vagyonbukott AddAdj;
vallott AddAdj;
versenyzett AddAdj;
vett AddAdj;
világosult AddAdj;
viszonzott AddAdj;
volt AddAdj;
vurst AddAdj;
választójogosult AddAdj;
várakoztatott AddAdj;
véghezvitt AddAdj;
zaklatott AddAdj;
zselézett AddAdj;
zsúfolt AddAdj;
ábrándult AddAdj;
állapodott AddAdj;
általánosított AddAdj;
árvult AddAdj;
áztatott AddAdj;
óhajtott AddAdj;
